Virginia statutes. Title 42.1. Libraries.
Article 2. State Librarian, Assistants and Employees.

§ 42.1-13.
Appointment; terms of office; employment; duties.

The Board shall appoint a librarian, to be known as the Librarian of Virginia, who shall serve at the pleasure of the Board. The Librarian of Virginia shall appoint principal assistants and approve the appointment of other employees. The terms of office and employment of such assistants and employees shall be subject to the personnel regulations of the Commonwealth.

The Librarian of Virginia shall supervise the administration of The Library of Virginia. The Librarian of Virginia shall make requests for appropriations of necessary funds and approve all expenditures of Library funds. Such expenditures shall be made as provided by law.

History.

Code 1950, § 42-48; 1970, c. 606; 1984, c. 444; 1985, c. 397; 1986, c. 565; 1994, c. 64; 1996, c. 812; 1998, c. 427.

The 1998 amendment

deleted “State” preceding “Librarian” and inserted “of Virginia” throughout this section.

§ 42.1-14.
Compensation.

The Librarian of Virginia, assistants and employees shall be paid such salaries from appropriations out of the public treasury as are provided by law.

History.

Code 1950, § 42-49; 1970, c. 606; 1998, c. 427.

The 1998 amendment

deleted “State” preceding “Librarian” and inserted “of Virginia.”

§ 42.1-15.
Duties of Librarian of Virginia.

The Librarian of Virginia shall have charge of The Library of Virginia. He shall see that the Library is properly kept and that its contents are properly preserved and cared for.

He shall be secretary of the Board, and shall perform all duties belonging to that position. He shall keep a record of all proceedings of the Board and such financial records as are required by the Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, § 42-50; 1970, c. 606; 1994, c. 64; 1998, c. 427.

Cross references.

As to Librarian of Virginia being in charge of Land Office, see §

41.1-1

.

The 1998 amendment,

in the first sentence of the first paragraph, deleted “State” preceding “Librarian” and inserted “of Virginia.”

§ 42.1-15.1.
Qualifications required to hold professional librarian position.

Public libraries serving a political subdivision or subdivisions having a population greater than 15,000 and libraries operated by the Commonwealth or under its authority shall not employ, in the position of librarian or in any other full-time professional librarian position, a person who does not meet the qualifications established by the State Library Board.

A professional librarian position as used in this section is one that requires a knowledge of books and of library technique equivalent to that required for graduation from any accredited library school or one that requires graduation from a school of library science accredited by the American Library Association.

No funds derived from any state aid shall be paid to any person whose employment does not comply with this section.

This section shall not apply to law libraries organized pursuant to Chapter 4 (§

42.1-60

et seq.), libraries in institutions of higher education, or public school libraries.

History.

1988, c. 716; 2004, c. 559; 2006, c. 539; 2012, c. 296.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 539, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply only to persons who on or after July 1, 2006 are employed to fill a vacancy in a position governed by §

42.1-15.1

.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the following changes were made to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588: in the last paragraph, substituted “libraries in institutions of higher education, or” for “libraries in colleges and universities or to”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 559, in the first paragraph, substituted “a population greater than 13,000” for “over 5,000 population,” and inserted “use funds derived from any state aid to”; and in the third paragraph, substituted “funds derived from any state aid” for “public funds.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 539 deleted “use funds derived from any state aid to” preceding “employ” in the first paragraph.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 296 substituted “a population greater than 15,000” for “a population greater than 13,000” in the first paragraph; and deleted “of this title” following “Chapter 4 (§

42.1-60

et seq.)” in the last paragraph.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Qualifications of librarians. —

The term “librarian” historically appears to be a term of art referring to what now is understood to be the “library director” or “library administrator.” See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Peter E. Broadbent, Jr., Chairman, The Library Board, 04-067, 2004 Va. AG LEXIS 69 (11/4/04).

This section and §

42.1-52

require that librarians in local or regional libraries, in the position of director, and other persons holding full-time professional positions deemed by the local or regional library to require American Library Association-equivalent training, shall meet the qualification standards established by the Library Board. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Peter E. Broadbent, Jr., Chairman, The Library Board, 04-067, 2004 Va. AG LEXIS 69 (11/4/04).

No Virginia statute requires the Library Board to offer a dual-track certification if the Board deems an American Library Association-based certification to be sufficient; if the Board elects to implement a certification process that is not approved by the Association, however, legislation or regulations may be necessary to authorize the Board to provide standards and guidance for such alternative credentialing, including express authorization to “grandfather” librarians who obtained their Library of Virginia “certification for life” prior to repeal of the State Board for the Certification of Librarians. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Peter E. Broadbent, Jr., Chairman, The Library Board, 04-067, 2004 Va. AG LEXIS 69 (11/4/04).

The intent of the librarian certification statute is to encourage that all public libraries have at least one credentialed director/librarian available to that library system, as well as an American Library Association-credentialed librarian, or a similarly credentialed professional, for positions deemed by the local bodies to require such specialized training; it is incumbent on each local or regional library board to determine whether any particular position constitutes a “full-time professional librarian position” as described in this section. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Peter E. Broadbent, Jr., Chairman, The Library Board, 04-067, 2004 Va. AG LEXIS 69 (11/4/04).

The Library Board is not authorized to “grandfather” librarians serving before 1988, who do not meet current qualifications. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Peter E. Broadbent, Jr., Chairman, The Library Board, 04-067, 2004 Va. AG LEXIS 69 (11/4/04).

§ 42.1-16.
Bond of Librarian of Virginia.

The Librarian of Virginia shall be bonded in accordance with §

2.2-1840

for the faithful discharge of his duties and the delivery over to his successor of all the property of the Commonwealth in his possession.

History.

Code 1950, § 42-51; 1970, c. 606; 1998, c. 427; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 152.

The 1998 amendment

deleted “State” preceding “Librarian” and inserted “of Virginia.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 152, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “be bonded in accordance with §

2.2-1840

” for “give bond to the Commonwealth in the sum of $2,000, with sureties approved by the State Treasurer, subject to the approval of the Governor” and deleted “which bond shall be recorded by the Secretary of the Commonwealth and deposited with the Comptroller” from the end.

§ 42.1-17.
Repealed by Acts 2006, c. 59, cl. 2.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to cities and towns furnishing copies of official publications to the Library of Virginia, see §

42.1-94

.

§ 42.1-18.
Exchanges; donation, etc., of duplicate material.

The Library may arrange for the exchange of the Virginia publications with such states and institutions, the general government and other governments, societies and others, as it sees fit. Publications received on exchange are to become the property of The Library of Virginia, except statute and law books, which shall be placed in the Law Library. The Library may also, when deemed advantageous, donate, exchange or sell any or all duplicate material now or hereafter the property of The Library of Virginia, and other printed material not within the scope of its collections. The Librarian of Virginia shall keep an accurate account of all such sales and pay the money arising therefrom into the general fund of the state treasury.

History.

Code 1950, § 42-56; 1970, c. 606; 1994, c. 64; 1998, c. 427.

The 1998 amendment

inserted “of Virginia” in the last sentence.

§§ 42.1-19 through 42.1-19.4.
Repealed by Acts 2006, c. 59, cl. 2.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to State Publications Depository Program, see §§

42.1-92

through

42.1-97

.